Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 10. POLITICAL PARTIES

SUBTITLE C. PARTIES NOMINATING BY CONVENTION

CHAPTER 182. PARTY WITHOUT STATE ORGANIZATION

Sec. 182.001. NOMINATING BY CONVENTION AUTHORIZED. A political party that does not have a state executive committee may make nominations for county or precinct offices by convention as provided by this chapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 182.002. PARTY ORGANIZATION. A political party making nominations under this chapter shall:

(1) establish a county executive committee for each county in which the party will hold a county convention;

(2) select a chair for each county executive committee; and

(3) select a precinct chair for each election precinct in which the party will hold a precinct convention.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 194, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 182.003. QUALIFYING FOR PLACEMENT ON BALLOT. To be entitled to have the names of its nominees placed on the general election ballot, a political party making nominations under this chapter must file with the county clerk, not later than the 75th day after the date of the precinct conventions held under this chapter, lists of precinct convention participants indicating that the number of participants equals at least three percent of the total number of votes received in the county by all candidates for governor in the most recent gubernatorial general election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 182.004. PETITION SUPPLEMENTING PRECINCT CONVENTION LISTS. (a) If the number of precinct convention participants indicated on the lists filed under Section 182.003 is fewer than the number required for the political party to qualify to have the names of its nominees placed on the ballot, the party may qualify by filing a petition as provided by this section.

(b) A petition must:

(1) satisfy the requirements prescribed by Section 141.062 for a candidate's petition;

(2) contain signatures in a number that, when added to the number of convention participants indicated on the lists, equals at least three percent of the total number of votes received in the county by all candidates for governor in the most recent gubernatorial general election; and

(3) be filed with the county clerk by the county chair before the deadline for filing the lists of precinct convention participants.

(c) Except as provided by this section, the petition is subject to the applicable provisions of Subchapter C, Chapter 141.

(d) A signer's voter registration must be in the county in which the party seeks to be qualified but is not required to be in any other particular territory.

(e) A copy of a request for the withdrawal of a signature must be delivered to the county chair when the withdrawal request is filed.

(f) Sections 181.006(f)-(j) apply to a petition circulated under this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 195, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 182.0041. APPLICATION FOR NOMINATION. (a) To be entitled to be considered for nomination by a convention held under this chapter, a person must make an application for nomination.

(b) Subchapter B, Chapter 181, applies to an application for nomination under this chapter.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 182.005. NOMINATIONS MADE BY COUNTY CONVENTION. A political party must make its nominations under this chapter at a county convention held on the first Saturday after the second Tuesday in March of the election year. The convention consists of delegates selected at precinct conventions held on the second Tuesday in March in the regular county election precincts.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S. ch. 14, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 182.006. ORGANIZING PRECINCT CONVENTION. A precinct convention held under this chapter shall be organized as provided by Section 181.066.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 182.007. PARTY'S CERTIFICATION OF NOMINEES. (a) The county chair shall certify in writing for placement on the general election ballot the name and address of each of the political party's nominees.

(b) Not later than the 20th day after the date of the county convention, the county chair shall deliver the certification to the authority responsible for having the official general election ballot prepared in the county.

(c) The county chair may not certify a candidate's name if, before delivering the certification, the county chair learns that the name is to be omitted from the ballot under Section 145.035.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 196, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.